Louisiana, session 2026, HB643.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:90(F) and 90.3(L) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§90. Gambling
* * *
F. The purchase of lottery tickets through the internet, as provided in R.S.
47:9008, shall not be considered gambling for the purposes of this Section.
* * *
§90.3. Gambling by computer
* * *
L. The purchase of lottery tickets through the internet, as provided in R.S.
47:9008, shall not be considered gambling by computer for the purposes of this
Section.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-735 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 643
Section 2. R.S. 47:9008(A)(9) and 9029(A)(3) are hereby amended and reenacted
and 9002(31) and (32) and 9008(B) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9002. Definitions
As used in this Subtitle, the following words and phrases shall have the
following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
* * *
(31) "I lottery" means the purchase of lottery tickets through the internet.
(32) "I lottery gross revenues" means the amount equal to the gross revenue
of all purchases of lottery tickets through the internet in which the player may
determine instantly if the ticket is a winning ticket less the total amount of all
winnings paid out to holders of winning lottery tickets purchased through the
internet.
* * *
§9008. Board; lottery games; regulation
A. The board may adopt rules for the conduct of specific lottery games and
operations, including but not limited to rules specifying:
* * *
(9) Any other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and effective
operation of the lottery or for the convenience of the public, including the purchase
of lottery tickets through the internet.
B. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act to implement, administer, and regulate the purchase of lottery tickets
through the internet, including but not limited to the following:
(1) Requiring age verification methods that prohibit persons under the age
of twenty-one from purchasing lottery tickets through the internet.
(2) Requiring location verification methods that restrict the purchase of
lottery tickets through the internet to individuals physically located within this state
of Louisiana.
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-735 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 643
§9029. Deposit of revenues; expenditures and investments authorized; transfer of
revenues to state treasury; dedication and use of proceeds; corporation
operating account; audit of corporation books and records; audits
A.
* * *
(3) Within twenty days following the close of each calendar month, the
corporation shall transfer to the Lottery Proceeds Fund in the state treasury the
amount of net revenues which the corporation determines are surplus to its needs.
Net revenues or proceeds shall be determined by deducting from gross revenues the
payment costs incurred or estimated to be incurred in the operation and
administration of the lottery. This shall include includes the expenses of the
corporation and the costs resulting from any contract or contracts entered into for
promotional, advertising, or operational services or for the purchase or lease of
lottery equipment and materials, fixed capital outlays, and the payment of prizes to
the holders of winning tickets. After the first year of operation, the corporation shall
transfer each year not less than twenty-five percent of gross revenues and I lottery
gross revenues to the state treasury.
* * *
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
renumber the definitions in R.S. 47:9002 to ensure the definitions are in alphabetical order.